Alabama, session 2026rs, HB490.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Until the next term of office, the
Revenue Commissioner of Tallapoosa County shall continue to
receive the same base annual salary that the revenue
commissioner is receiving on May 31, 2026.
(b) Beginning on June 1, 2026, in addition to the base
annual salary authorized in subsection (a), the revenue
commissioner shall receive an expense allowance in such amount
as necessary so that the total annual compensation received
equals one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per annum,
payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of
the county.
(c)(1) Effective beginning with the next term of
office, the revenue commissioner shall receive a base annual
salary of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per annum,
payable in equal monthly installments, and subsections (a) and
(b) are void.
(2) The salary provided by this subsection shall be in
lieu of any salary or other compensation provided by law and
shall be paid from the same funding sources as the salary of
the revenue commissioner is paid on June 1, 2026.
Section 2. (a) Until the next term of office, the Judge
of Probate of Tallapoosa County shall continue to receive the
Page 1

of Probate of Tallapoosa County shall continue to receive the
HB490 Enrolled
same base annual salary that the judge of probate is receiving
on May 31, 2026.
(b) Beginning on June 1, 2026, in addition to the base
annual salary authorized in subsection (a), the judge of
probate shall receive an expense allowance in such amount as
necessary so that the total annual compensation received
equals one hundred and six thousand dollars ($106,000) per
annum, payable in equal monthly installments from the general
fund of the county.
(c)(1) Effective beginning with the next term of
office, the judge of probate shall receive a base annual
salary of one hundred and six thousand dollars ($106,000) per
annum, payable in equal monthly installments from the same
funding sources as the salary of the judge of probate is paid
on June 1, 2026, and subsections (a) and (b) are void.
(2) The salary provided by this subsection shall be in
lieu of any salary provided by law and shall supersede the
compensation provided to the judge of probate in Act 275, 1969
Regular Session (Acts 1969, p. 607-608), as amended by Act
437, 1978 Regular Session (Acts 1978, p. 449-450), and the
specific provisions of that act are void.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 2

2026.
HB490 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 26-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 05-Mar-26 Passed



Page 3